Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-506
Statute of limitation.

An action for misappropriation shall be brought within four years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation shall constitute a single claim.

Laws 1988, LB 337A, § 6.